District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1518

Reinstatement.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 19, 24 DCR 5975
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-118.
1973 Ed., § 2-958.
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.